Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-664
Solid tire, defined.

Solid tire shall mean every tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon compressed air or metal for the support of the load of the wheel to which it attaches.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 160.